Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.650

Public works or improvements—Minority business, employees—Contract, contents.

All contracts by and between a first-class city and contractors for any public work or improvement exceeding the sum of ten thousand dollars, or fifteen thousand dollars for construction of water mains, shall contain the following clause:

"Contractor agrees that the contractor shall actively solicit the employment of minority group members. Contractor further agrees that the contractor shall actively solicit bids for the subcontracting of goods or services from qualified minority businesses. Contractor shall furnish evidence of the contractor's compliance with these requirements of minority employment and solicitation. Contractor further agrees to consider the grant of subcontracts to said minority bidders on the basis of substantially equal proposals in the light most favorable to said minority businesses. The contractor shall be required to submit evidence of compliance with this section as part of the bid."

As used in this section, the term "minority business" means a business at least fifty-one percent of which is owned by minority group members. Minority group members include, but are not limited to, blacks, women, native Americans, Asians, Eskimos, Aleuts, and Hispanics.

[ 2002 c 307 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 56 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 307: See note following RCW 1.20.130.